Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska58-210
Bond, defined.

Bond shall mean any bond, note, debenture, interim certificate, bond anticipation note, or other evidence of financial indebtedness.

Laws 1983, LB 626, § 10;

Laws 1991, LB 253, § 12.